Utah statutes.
41-1a-214.   Registration card to be signed, carried, and exhibited.

(1)  A registration card shall be signed by the owner in ink in the space provided.

(2)  A registration card shall be carried at all times in the vehicle to which it was issued.

(3)  The person driving or in control of a vehicle shall display the registration card upon demand of a peace officer or any officer or employee of the division.

